Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-611
Irrigation water wells; spacing requirements not applicable; when.

The prohibitions of section 46-609 shall not apply to the location of more than one irrigation water well by a landowner on his or her own farm, so long as each such irrigation water well is at least six hundred feet from any other irrigation water well located on a neighboring farm under separate ownership.

Laws 1957, c. 201, § 4, p. 705;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 10.